Idaho statutes. TITLE 34 ELECTIONS
CHAPTER 4
VOTERS — PRIVILEGES, QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION

Section.

34-401. Electors privileged from arrest during attendance at polling place — Exception.

Electors are privileged from arrest, except for treason, a felony or breach of the peace, during their attendance at a polling place.

34-402. Qualifications of electors.

Every male or female citizen of the United States, eighteen (18) years old, who has resided in this state and in the county for thirty (30) days where he or she offers to vote prior to the day of election, if registered within the time period provided by law, is a qualified elector.

34-403. Disqualified electors not permitted to vote.

No elector shall be permitted to vote if he is disqualified as provided in article 6 [VI], sections 2 and 3 of the state constitution.

34-404. Registration of electors.

All electors must register before being able to vote at any primary, general, special, school or any other election governed by the provisions of title 34, Idaho Code. Registration of a qualified person occurs when a legible, accurate and complete registration application is received in the office of the county clerk or is received at the polls pursuant to section 34-408A, Idaho Code.

Each elector may select on the registration application an affiliation with a political party qualified to participate in elections pursuant to section 34-501, Idaho Code, or may select to be designated as “unaffiliated.” The county clerk shall record the party affiliation or “unaffiliated” designation so selected as part of the elector’s registration record. If an elector shall fail or refuse to make such a selection, the county clerk shall enter on the registration records that such elector is “unaffiliated.”

In order to provide an elector with the appropriate primary election ballot, pursuant to section 34-904A, Idaho Code, the poll book for primary elections shall include the party affiliation or designation as “unaffiliated” for each elector so registered. An “unaffiliated” elector shall declare to the poll worker which primary election ballot the elector chooses to vote in, pursuant to section 34-904A, Idaho Code, and the poll worker or other authorized election personnel shall record such declaration in the poll book. The poll book shall contain checkoff boxes to allow the poll worker or other authorized election personnel to record such “unaffiliated” elector’s selection.

In order to provide electors who are already registered to vote, and who remain registered electors, with an opportunity to select a party affiliation or to select their status as “unaffiliated,” the poll book for the 2012 primary election shall include checkoff boxes by which the poll worker or other appropriate election personnel shall record such elector’s choice of party affiliation or choice to be designated as “unaffiliated.” After the 2012 primary election, the county clerk shall record the party affiliation or “unaffiliated” designation so selected in the poll book as part of such an elector’s record within the voter registration system as provided for in section 34-437A, Idaho Code.

After the 2012 primary election, electors who remain registered voters and who did not vote in the 2012 primary election or who have not selected party affiliation or who have not selected to be designated as “unaffiliated,” shall be designated as “unaffiliated” and the county clerk shall record that designation for each such elector within the voter registration system as provided for in section 34-437A, Idaho Code.

34-405. Gain or loss of residence by reason of absence from state.

For the purpose of voting, no person shall be deemed to have gained or lost a residence by reason of his absence while employed in the service of this state or the United States, while a student of any institution of learning, while kept at any state institution at public expense, nor absent from the state with the intent to have this state remain his residence. If a person is absent from this state but intends to maintain his residence for voting purposes here, he shall not register to vote in any other state during his absence.

34-406. Appointment of registrars.

The county clerk shall provide for voter registration in the clerk’s office and may appoint registrars to assist in voter registration throughout the county.

The county clerk shall provide all political parties within the county with a supply of the registration form prescribed in section 34-411, Idaho Code.

34-407. Procedure for registration.

Any county clerk or official registrar shall register without charge any elector who personally appears in the office of the county clerk or before the official registrar, as the case may be, and requests to be registered.

Upon receipt of a written application to the county clerk from any elector who, by reason of illness or physical incapacity is prevented from personally appearing in the office of the county clerk or before an official registrar, the county clerk or an official registrar so directed by the county clerk shall register such elector at the place of abode of the elector.

34-408. Closing of register — Time limit.

No elector may register in the office of the county clerk within twenty-four (24) days preceding any election held throughout the county in which he resides for the purpose of voting at such election; provided however, a legible, accurate and complete registration application received in the office of the county clerk during the twenty-four (24) day period preceding an election shall be accepted and held by the county clerk until the day following the election when registration reopens, at which time the registration shall become effective. This deadline shall also apply to any registrars the county clerk may have appointed.

Any elector who will complete his residence requirement or attain the requisite voting age during the period when the register of electors is closed may register prior to the closing of the register.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an individual who is eligible to vote may also register, upon providing proof of residence, at the “absent electors’ polling place” provided in section 34-1006, Idaho Code.

34-408A. Election day registration.

An individual who is eligible to vote may register on election day by appearing in person at the polling place for the precinct in which the individual maintains residence, by completing a registration application, making an oath in the form prescribed by the secretary of state and providing proof of residence. An individual may prove residence for purposes of registering by:

Showing an Idaho driver’s license or Idaho identification card issued through the department of transportation; or

Showing any document which contains a valid address in the precinct together with a picture identification card; or

Showing a current valid student photo identification card from a postsecondary educational institution in Idaho accompanied with a current student fee statement that contains the student’s valid address in the precinct.

Election day registration provided in this section shall apply to all elections conducted under title 34, Idaho Code, and to school district and municipal elections.

An individual who is eligible to vote may also register, upon providing proof of residence, at the “absent electors’ polling place” provided in section 34-1006, Idaho Code.

34-409. Electronic registration.

The office of the secretary of state may create and maintain an electronic system for voter registration that is publicly available on its official website. Any qualified elector who has a current valid driver’s license or identification card issued pursuant to title 49, Idaho Code, that reflects the person’s current principal place of residence, may register to vote by submitting a completed voter registration application electronically through such website. Electronic voter registration applications shall be submitted before the close of registration as provided in section 34-408, Idaho Code.

The electronic voter registration application shall be in a form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall:

Require the information under oath or affirmation set forth in section 34-411, Idaho Code;

Include notice of the requirement to provide personal identification before voting at the polls as set forth in sections 34-1113 and 34-1114, Idaho Code; and

Require an electronic signature of the applicant.

The office of the secretary of state shall obtain a digital copy of the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card signature from the Idaho transportation department. The Idaho transportation department shall, upon request of the office of the secretary of state, provide a digital copy of the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card signature.

Upon receipt of a completed voter registration application and a digital copy of the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card signature from the Idaho transportation department, the office of the secretary of state shall send the information to the county clerk for the county in which the applicant resides. The county clerk shall prepare and issue to each elector registering electronically a verification of registration containing the name and residence of the elector and the name or number of the precinct in which the elector resides. Such verification of registration may be sent by nonforwardable first-class mail or by electronic mail at the elector’s option. If a verification is returned undeliverable, then the county clerk shall remove the elector from the register of electors.

An applicant using the electronic system for voter registration pursuant to this section shall not be required to complete a printed registration card.

The office of the secretary of state shall use such security measures necessary to ensure the accuracy and integrity of an electronically submitted voter registration application.

34-410. Mail registration.

Any elector may register by mail for any election. Any mail registration application must be received by the county clerk prior to the close of registration as provided in section 34-408, Idaho Code, provided that any mail registration application postmarked not later than twenty-five (25) days prior to an election shall be deemed timely.

The secretary of state shall prescribe the form for the mail registration application. This mail application form shall be available for distribution through governmental and private entities, with particular emphasis on making them available for organized voter registration programs.

Any federal mail registration form adopted pursuant to the provisions of the national voter registration act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31) shall also be accepted as a valid registration, if such form is postmarked not later than twenty-five (25) days prior to an election.

The county clerk shall prepare and issue by first class nonforwardable mail to each elector registering by mail a verification of registration containing the name and residence of the elector and the name or number of the precinct in which the elector resides.

A verification returned undeliverable shall cause the county clerk to remove the elector’s card from the register of electors.

As required by the help America vote act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252), a copy of proper identification will be required prior to issuance of a ballot to anyone who has registered by mail and has not previously voted in an election for federal office in the state. Proper identification consists of:

A current and valid photo identification; or

A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name and address of the voter.

34-410A. Absentee registration for uniformed and overseas citizens.

Whenever provision is made for absentee voting by a statute of the United States, including the “Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act” (42 U.S.C. 1973ff.), an application for an absentee ballot made under that law may be given the same effect as an application for an absentee ballot made under chapter 10, title 34, Idaho Code.

34-411. Application for registration — Contents.

Each elector who requests registration shall supply the following information under oath or affirmation:

Full name and sex.

Mailing address, residence address or any other necessary information definitely locating the elector’s residence.

The period of time preceding the date of registration during which the elector has resided in the state.

Whether or not the elector is a citizen.

That the elector is under no legal disqualifications to vote.

The county and state where the elector was previously registered, if any.

Date of birth.

Current driver’s license number or identification card issued by the Idaho transportation department. In the absence of an Idaho driver’s license or state issued identification card, the last four (4) digits of the elector’s social security number.

As provided for in section 34-404, Idaho Code, each elector shall select an affiliation with a political party qualified to participate in elections pursuant to section 34-501, Idaho Code, or select to be designated as “unaffiliated.” The selection of party affiliation or designation as “unaffiliated” shall be maintained within the voter registration system as provided for in section 34-437A, Idaho Code. If an elector shall fail or refuse to make such a selection, the county clerk shall record as “unaffiliated” such elector within the voter registration system as provided for in section 34-437A, Idaho Code.

Any elector who shall supply any information under subsection (1) of this section, knowing it to be false, is guilty of perjury.

Each elector who requests registration may, at the elector’s option, supply the elector’s telephone number. If the telephone number is supplied by the elector, the telephone number shall be available to the public.

34-411A. Primary elections — Changing party affiliation — Unaffiliated electors.

For a primary election, including a presidential primary election, an elector may change such elector’s political party affiliation or become “unaffiliated” by filing a signed form with the county clerk no later than the last day a candidate may file for partisan political office prior to such primary election, as provided for in section 34-704 or 34-732, Idaho Code. An “unaffiliated” elector may affiliate with the party of the elector’s choice by filing a signed form up to and including election day. The application form described in section 34-1002, Idaho Code, shall also be used for this purpose.

For a primary election, an “unaffiliated” elector may select a political party affiliation only prior to voting in the primary election. An elector may make such selection on or before election day, by declaring such political party affiliation to the poll worker or other appropriate election personnel. The poll worker or other appropriate election personnel shall then record in the poll book the elector’s choice. After the primary election, the county clerk shall record the party affiliation so recorded in the poll book as part of such elector’s record within the voter registration system as provided for in section 34-437A, Idaho Code.

34-412. Qualifications for registration.

The qualifications of any person who requests to be registered shall be determined in the first instance by the registering official from the evidence before him. If the registering official determines that such person is not qualified, he shall refuse to register the person.

A person refused registration under subsection (1) of this section may make application to the county clerk for a hearing on his qualifications. Not more than ten (10) days after the date he receives such application, the county clerk shall hold a hearing on the qualifications of the applicant and shall notify the applicant of the place and time of such hearing. At such hearing the applicant may present evidence as to his qualifications, provided that no hearing shall be held subsequent to any election which is held within said ten (10) day period. If the county clerk determines that the applicant is qualified, the county clerk shall register the applicant immediately upon the conclusion of the hearing.

34-413. Reregistration of elector who changes residence.

An elector who moves to another county within the state or to another state within thirty (30) days prior to any election shall be permitted to vote in the ensuing election by absentee ballot or at the polling place assigned to the elector’s prior address.

34-414. Voter’s affidavit of elector who moves within a county. [Repealed.]

34-415. Certificates of registration. [Repealed.]

34-416. Registration applications.

The registration application shall contain the following warning:

The elector shall read the warning set forth in subsection (1) of this section and shall sign his name in an appropriate place on the completed application.

The registration application completed and signed as provided in this section constitutes the official registration application of the elector. The county clerk shall keep and file all such applications in a convenient manner in his office. Such applications shall be considered confidential and unavailable for public inspection and copying except as provided by subsection (25) of section 74-106, Idaho Code.

The statewide voter registration database maintained by the secretary of state’s office shall constitute the register of electors.

WARNING: Any elector who supplies any information, knowing it to be false, is guilty of perjury.

34-417. Changes in boundaries of precinct

Alteration of registration cards. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2019, ch. 96, § 5, effective March 18, 2019.

34-418. Weekly review of new registration cards — Report to interested officials.

Each week the county clerk shall review the registration cards of all newly registered electors for the past weekly period to determine whether they have been previously registered to vote in another state or in another county within this state. The county clerk or secretary of state, through the statewide voter registration system, shall notify the proper registration official or county clerk where the elector was previously registered so that the prior registration may be canceled. The form of such notice shall be prescribed by the secretary of state.

34-419. Suspension of registration of electors who appear not to be citizens of the United States.

The county clerk shall remove from the register of electors the official registration application of any elector who appears by the registration records in the office of the county clerk not to be a citizen of the United States and shall suspend the registration of such elector. The county clerk shall mail a written notice of such removal and suspension to the elector at his residence address indicated on the application. If the elector proves to the county clerk that he is in fact a citizen of the United States, his application shall be replaced in the register and his registration reinstated.

34-420. No elector’s registration shall be canceled while serving in the armed forces — Exception.

Except as provided in section 34-435, Idaho Code, or for registering to vote in another jurisdiction, no elector’s registration shall be canceled, nor shall he be deprived of his right to vote at any election by reason of the removal of his official registration application from the register of electors, during any period that he is serving in the armed forces of the United States or of any ally of the United States.

34-421. Reregistration

When required. [Repealed.]

34-422. Transfer of registration. [Repealed.]

34-423. Change of name

Voting. [Repealed.]

34-424 — 34-430. Special registration of persons with less than six months residency. [Repealed.]

34-431. Challenges of entries in election register.

At the time of any election, any registered elector may challenge the entry of an elector’s name as it appears in the election register. Such a challenge will be noted in the remarks column following the elector’s name stating the reason, such as “died,” “moved,” or “incorrect address.” The individual making the challenge shall sign his name following the entry.

34-432. Correction of election register from challenges at election.

No later than the ninth Friday after each election, the county clerk shall examine the election register and note the challenges as described in section 34-431, Idaho Code. The county clerk shall mail a written inquiry to the challenged elector at his mailing address as indicated on his registration card. Such inquiry shall state the nature of the challenge and provide a suitable form for reply.

Within twenty (20) days from the date of mailing of the written inquiry, the elector may, in person or in writing, state that the information on his registration card is correct. Upon receipt of such a statement or request, the county clerk shall determine whether the information satisfies the challenge. If the county clerk determines that the challenge has not been satisfied, the county clerk shall schedule a hearing on the challenge and shall notify the elector of the place and time of the hearing. The hearing shall be held no later than twenty (20) days after notice is given. At the hearing, the challenged elector may present evidence of qualification. If the county clerk, upon the conclusion of the hearing, determines that the challenged elector’s registration is not valid, the county clerk shall cancel the registration. If a challenged elector fails to make the statement or request in response to the inquiry, the county clerk shall cancel the registration.

The county clerk may make inquiry into the validity of any registration at any time. The inquiry shall proceed as provided in this section.

34-433. Monthly correction of election register from reported deaths.

The state board of health [and welfare] shall, on or about the 25th day of each month, furnish to the secretary of state a listing showing the name, age, county of residence and residence address of each Idaho resident who has died during the preceding month. The secretary of state shall sort this list by county and furnish a copy of same to each county clerk. Each county clerk shall immediately cancel all registrations of individuals reported as deceased by the state board of health [and welfare] in the board’s report to the secretary of state.

34-434. Retention of notices and correspondence relating to correction of election registers.

Copies of all notices and other correspondence issued pursuant to the directives contained in sections 67 and 68 of this act [34-432, 34-433, Idaho Code,] shall be retained by the county clerk for a period of two (2) years from date of mailing.

34-435. Cancellation of registrations following any general election of those not voting for four years.

Within one hundred twenty (120) days following the date of the general election, the county clerk shall examine the election register and the signed statements of challenge made at that election. After this examination, the county clerk shall immediately cancel the registration of any elector who did not vote at any election in the past four (4) years.

This section shall be construed as to provide for a uniform four (4) year registration period for all electors.

34-436. Retention of correspondence relating to cancellation of voter’s registration.

All correspondence relating to the cancellation of an elector’s registration shall be preserved by the county clerk for a period of two (2) years following the time of any general election.

34-437. Furnishing lists of registered electors — Restrictions.

Each of the county clerks, upon receiving a request shall supply to any individual, a current list of the registered electors of the county and their addresses, arranged in groups according to election precincts. The county clerks shall prepare an original of the above list from the state voter registration system at county expense. Any person desiring a copy of the original list shall be furnished the same, and the county clerk shall assess the individual an amount which will compensate the county for the cost of reproducing such copy.

No person to whom a list of registered electors is made available or supplied under subsection (1) of this section and no person who acquires a list of registered electors prepared from such list shall use any information contained therein for the purpose of mailing or delivering any advertisement or offer for any property, establishment, organization, product, or service or for the purpose of mailing or delivering any solicitation for money, services, or anything of value. Provided however, that any such list and label may be used for any political purpose.

34-437A. Statewide list of registered electors.

The secretary of state, in conjunction with county clerks, shall develop and implement a single, uniform official, centralized, interactive, computerized statewide voter registration system as required by the help America vote act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252).

The statewide system shall contain the name and registration information of every legally registered voter in the state and assign a unique identifier to each legally registered voter in the state, and include the following:

The computerized list shall serve as the single system for storing and managing the official list of registered voters throughout the state.

The computerized list shall contain the name and registration information of every legally registered voter in the state.

Under the computerized list, a unique identifier shall be assigned to each legally registered voter in the state.

The computerized list shall be coordinated with other agency databases within the state.

Any election official in the state, including any local election official, may obtain immediate electronic access to the information contained in the computerized list.

All voter registration information obtained by any local election official in the state shall be electronically entered into the computerized list on an expedited basis at the time the information is provided to the local official.

The secretary of state shall provide such support as may be required so that local election officials are able to enter information as described in subsection (2)(f) of this section.

The computerized list shall serve as the official voter registration list for the conduct of all elections for federal office in the state.

Any person desiring a copy of the statewide list of registered electors shall be furnished the same, and the secretary of state shall assess the individual an amount which will compensate the state for the cost of reproducing such copy.

No person to whom a list of statewide electors is furnished and no person who acquires a list of statewide electors prepared from such list shall use any information contained therein for the purpose of mailing or delivering any advertisement or offer for any property, establishment, organization, product, or service or for the purpose of mailing or delivering any solicitation for money, services, or anything of value. Provided however, that any such list and label may be used for any political purpose.

34-437B. Furnishing lists of registered electors to school districts.

Each of the county clerks, upon receiving a request therefor, not later than the thirtieth day prior to a school election, shall, not later than the seventh day prior to the election, supply to a requesting school board a list of registered electors, that are within the school district within which a school district election is to be held. The county clerk may assess the school board an amount which will compensate the county for the cost of preparing such a list.

34-438. Data-processing systems

Use for voter registration. [Repealed.]

34-439. Disclosures in elections to authorize bonded indebtedness.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any taxing district that proposes to submit any question to the electors of the district that would authorize any bonded indebtedness shall provide a brief official statement setting forth in simple, understandable language information on the proposal substantially as follows:

The purpose for which the bonds are to be used including, but not necessarily limited to, a description of the facility and/or project that will be financed, in whole or in part, by the sale of the bonds; the date of the election; and the principal amount of the bonds to be issued;

The anticipated interest rate on the proposed bonds based upon current market rates and a maximum interest rate if a maximum is specified in the question to be submitted to electors;

The total amount to be repaid over the life of the bonds based on the anticipated interest. Such total shall reflect three (3) components: a total of the principal to be repaid; a total of the interest to be paid; and the sum of both;

The estimated average annual cost to the taxpayer of the proposed bond, in the format of “A tax of $ per $100,000 of taxable assessed value, per year, based on current conditions”;

The length of time, reflected in months or years, in which the proposed bonds will be paid off or retired; and

The total existing indebtedness, including interest accrued, of the taxing district.

The formula for calculating the estimated average annual cost to the taxpayer shall be as follows:
(2)(a) The formula for calculating the estimated average annual cost to the taxpayer shall be as follows:

The elements of which are defined as:

“Bond total” means the total amount to be bonded, from subsection (1)(c) of this section as based on the anticipated interest rate in subsection (1)(b) of this section;

“Duration” means the time, in years, from subsection (1)(e) of this section; and

“Taxable value” means the most recent total taxable value for property for the applicable taxing district, which shall be obtained from the applicable county treasurer or assessor’s office.

The official statement shall be made a part of the ballot prior to the location on the ballot where a person casts a vote and shall be included in the official notice of the election.

((Bond Total/Taxable Value) x 100,000)/Duration = estimated average annual cost to taxpayer; and

34-439A. Disclosures in elections to authorize levy.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law except for the provisions of section 63-802(1)(g) [(1)(h)], Idaho Code, any taxing district that proposes to submit any question to the electors of the district that would authorize any levy, except for the levies authorized for the purposes provided in sections 63-802(1)(g) [(1)(h)] and 33-802(4), Idaho Code, and except for levies relating to bonded indebtedness where section 34-439, Idaho Code, applies, shall include in the ballot question, or in a brief official statement on the ballot but separate from the ballot question, a disclosure setting forth in simple, understandable language information on the proposal substantially as follows:

The purpose for which the levy shall be used; the date of the election; and the dollar amount estimated to be collected each year from the levy;

The estimated average annual cost to the taxpayer of the proposed levy, in the form of “A tax of $ per one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of taxable assessed value, per year, based on current conditions.” The dollar amount shall be calculated by multiplying the expected levy rate by one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); and

The length of time, reflected in months or years, in which the proposed levy will be assessed.

The information called for in subsection (1) of this section shall be placed prior to the location on the ballot where a person casts a vote and shall also be included in like manner in the official notice of the election.